Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202679-10,139.04
Hunger-Free Schools Pilot Program; created; participation; requirements.

(1) The Hunger-Free Schools Pilot Program is created. The pilot program shall include school years 2026-27 through 2031-32.

(2) Any qualified school may apply to participate in the pilot program in the manner prescribed by the department.

(3) The department shall annually select schools to participate in the pilot program from applicant qualified schools.

(4) To receive funding under the pilot program, a participating school shall:

(a) Serve eligible meals through any school breakfast program or school lunch program operated by such school during the school day; and

(b) Submit information regarding the number of eligible meals served in a manner prescribed by the department.

Laws 2026, LB966, § 4.
July 18, 2026